Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2106.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5511(a) of Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5511. Petition and hearing; independent evaluation.(a) Resident.--The court, upon petition and hearing and upon the presentation of clear and convincing evidence, may find a person domiciled in the Commonwealth to be incapacitated and appoint a guardian or guardians of his person or estate. The following procedures apply:(1) The petitioner may be any person interested in the alleged incapacitated person's welfare.(2) The court may dismiss a proceeding where it determines that the proceeding has not been instituted to aid 123456789101112131415161718 or benefit the alleged incapacitated person or that the petition is incomplete or fails to provide sufficient facts to proceed.(3) Written notice of the petition and hearing shall be given in large type and in simple language to the alleged incapacitated person. The following apply to the notice:(i) The notice shall indicate the purpose and seriousness of the proceeding and the rights that can be lost as a result of the proceeding. [It](ii) The notice shall include the date, time and place of the hearing and an explanation of all rights.(iii) The Supreme Court shall establish a uniform citation for [this purpose] the purpose of this paragraph.(iv) A copy of the petition shall be attached to the notice.(4) Personal service shall be made on the alleged incapacitated person, and the contents and terms of the petition shall be explained to the maximum extent possible in language and terms the individual is most likely to understand. The following apply to service UPON THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED PERSON and notice TO OTHER INTERESTED PARTIES : (i) Service shall be no less than 20 days in advance of the hearing. [In addition, notice](ii) Notice of the petition and hearing shall be given in [such manner as the court shall direct] ACCORDANCE WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA RULES OF ORPHANS' COURT PROCEDURE to [all]:(A) All ADULT persons [residing within the Commonwealth who are sui juris and] WHO would be 20250HB2106PN3320 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entitled to share in the estate of the alleged incapacitated person if he died intestate at that time[, to the].(B) The person or institution providing residential services to the alleged incapacitated person [and to such other].(C) EACH PERSON WITH WHOM THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED PERSON RESIDES.(D) A PERSON NAMED AS AN AGENT UNDER A FINANCIAL POWER OF ATTORNEY, HEALTH CARE POWER OF ATTORNEY, ADVANCE HEALTH CARE DIRECTIVE OR MENTAL HEALTH CARE POWER OF ATTORNEY UNDER CHAPTER 54 (RELATING TO HEALTH CARE), 56 (RELATING TO POWERS OF ATTORNEY) OR 58 (RELATING TO MENTAL HEALTH CARE), IF KNOWN TO THE PETITIONER AT THE TIME THE PETITION IS FILED, AND AN ATTORNEY KNOWN TO THE PETITIONER TO REPRESENT THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED PERSON.(C) (E) Other parties as the court may direct, including other service providers.(iii) If notice cannot be given to any of the persons OR INSTITUTIONS listed under subparagraph (ii), notice of the petition and hearing shall be given in such manner as the court shall direct to: (A) Each person with whom the alleged incapacitated person resides.(B) The following persons who are known to the petitioner or whose existence and address can be ascertained by the petitioner with reasonably diligent efforts:(I) At least one, but not more than three, 20250HB2106PN3320 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the living relatives of the alleged incapacitated person in the nearest degree of kinship.(II) Any person or entity that has demonstrated a genuine interest in promoting ACCORDANCE WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA RULES OF ORPHANS' COURT PROCEDURE TO A PERSON THAT THE COURT, UPON HEARING, IS SATISFIED HAS DEMONSTRATED A GENUINE INTEREST IN THE WELFARE OF THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED PERSON AND PROMOTING the best interests of the alleged incapacitated person, such as by having a personal relationship with the person, regularly visiting the person or regularly communicating with the person.(5) The hearing may be closed to the public and without a jury unless the alleged incapacitated person or his counsel objects.(6) The hearing shall be closed and with or without a jury if the person alleged to be incapacitated or his counsel so requests.(7) The hearing may be held at the residence of the alleged incapacitated person.(8) The alleged incapacitated person shall be present at the hearing unless:[(1) the court is satisfied, upon the deposition or testimony of or sworn statement by a physician or licensed psychologist, that his physical or mental condition would be harmed by his presence; or(2) it is impossible for him to be present because of his absence from the Commonwealth. It shall not be necessary 20250HB2106PN3320 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the alleged incapacitated person to be represented by a guardian ad litem in the proceeding.](i) the court is satisfied, upon the deposition or testimony of or sworn statement by a physician or licensed psychologist, that his physical or mental condition would be harmed by his presence; or(ii) it is impossible for him to be present because of his absence from the Commonwealth. It shall not be necessary for the alleged incapacitated person to be represented by a guardian ad litem in the proceeding.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2106PN3320 - 5 - 123456789101112